District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.52

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“District” shall mean the District of Columbia.

(1A)

“Foster care and adoption assistance” means the programs authorized by Part E of Title IV of the Social Security Act, approved June 17, 1980 (94 Stat. 501; 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.).

(2)

“Fund” shall mean the Medicaid and Special Education Reform Fund established by § 4-204.53

(3)

“Medicaid” means the medical assistance programs authorized by title XIX of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), or by § 1-307.02, and administered by the Department of Health.

(4)

“Medicare” means the health insurance programs authorized by title XVIII of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 290; 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.).

(5)

“Special Education” means services provided under § 38-2501 to students who are classified as having a disability, as defined in section 101(a)(1) of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved April 13, 1970 (84 Stat. 175; 20 U.S.C. § 1401(a)(1)), or in section 7(8) of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, approved September 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 359; 29 U. S.C. § 706(8)).

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1552, 49 DCR 6968
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1503(a), 50 DCR 5668
D.C. Law 15-39, added pars. (1A), (4), and (5); and in par. (3), substituted “or by” for “and by”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1503(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1503(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).